incubator/apertium-as-hi/apertium-as-hi.hi.dix
		<pardef n="उछल_vblex">
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>हूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>हूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आ<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>उँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आ<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आ<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>इए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>इए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>आ<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<e lm="उछल"><i>उछल</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="उठ"><i>उठ</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="काट"><i>काट</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="खरीद"><i>खरीद</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="खाँस"><i>खाँस</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="खींच"><i>खींच</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="छिप"><i>छिप</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="छीन"><i>छीन</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="छोड़"><i>छोड़</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="जाग"><i>जाग</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="झगड़"><i>झगड़</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ठग"><i>ठग</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ठहर"><i>ठहर</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ठेल"><i>ठेल</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="डर"><i>डर</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="डूब"><i>डूब</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="तैर"><i>तैर</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="दब"><i>दब</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="देख"><i>देख</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="दौड़"><i>दौड़</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="निकल"><i>निकल</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="निकाल"><i>निकाल</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="पकड़"><i>पकड़</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="पढ़"><i>पढ़</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="पहचान"><i>पहचान</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="पहन"><i>पहन</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="फट"><i>फट</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="बज"><i>बज</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="बोल"><i>बोल</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="बैठ"><i>बैठ</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="रुक"><i>रुक</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="लग"><i>लग</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="लिख"><i>लिख</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="सोच"><i>सोच</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="हँस"><i>हँस</i><par n="उछल_vblex"/></e>
